Oklahoma, session 2026, SB498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 426.1, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 447, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 426.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 426.1. A. 1. All licensure revocation hearings


conducted pursuant to marijuana licenses established in the Oklahoma


Statutes shall be conducted pursuant to the requirements of the


Oklahoma Pleading Code, Section 2001 et seq. of Title 12 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


2. All licensure revocation hearings conducted pursuant to


marijuana licenses established in the Oklahoma Statutes shall be


recorded. A party may request a copy of the recording of the

Req. No. 1126 Page 1


proceedings. Copies shall be provided to local law enforcement if


the revocation was based on alleged criminal activity.


B. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall assist any


law enforcement officer in the performance of his or her duties upon


such request by the law enforcement officer or the request of other


local officials having jurisdiction. Except for license information


concerning licensed patients, as defined in Section 427.2 of this


title, the Authority shall share information with law enforcement


agencies upon request without a subpoena or search warrant.


C. The Authority shall make available all information on


whether a medical marijuana patient or caregiver license is valid to


law enforcement electronically through an online verification


system.


D. The Authority shall make available to state agencies and


political subdivisions a list of marijuana-licensed premises,


medical marijuana businesses or any other premises where marijuana


or its by-products are licensed to be cultivated, grown, processed,


stored or manufactured to aid state agencies and county and


municipal governments in identifying locations within their


jurisdiction and ensuring compliance with applicable laws, rules and


regulations.


E. 1. Any marijuana-licensed premises, medical marijuana


business or any other premises where marijuana or its by-products


are licensed to be cultivated, grown, processed, stored or

Req. No. 1126 Page 2


manufactured shall submit with its application or request to change


location, after notifying the political subdivision of its intent, a


certificate of occupancy from the political subdivision or State


Fire Marshal where the facility of the applicant or licensee is to


be located certifying compliance with zoning classifications,


applicable municipal ordinances and all applicable safety,


electrical, fire, plumbing, waste, construction and building


specification codes. If the political subdivision does not have an


authority having a jurisdiction agreement on file with the Office of


the State Fire Marshal, the State Fire Marshal shall certify


compliance with all applicable safety, electrical, fire, plumbing,


waste, construction, and building specification codes.


2. Beginning on May 28, 2021, upon the initial request for


renewal or transfer of a retail marijuana dispensary license, a


municipal government may object to the continued licensure of the


medical marijuana dispensary if the municipal government determines


it is operating contrary to the required setback distance from a


school including the error in measurement allowance authorized by


Section 425 of this title.


3. To prevent the granting of the grandfather provisions of


Section 425 of this title as a matter of law, the municipal


government shall provide the following documentation prior to the


initial renewal or transfer of a license:



Req. No. 1126 Page 3


a. a municipal resolution finding that the marijuana


dispensary is located within the prohibited setback


distance from a school that was openly in existence in


such a way that the public generally would have known


of the school’s existence and operation in that


location prior to the original marijuana dispensary


being licensed. For purposes of this subparagraph,


“openly in existence” means any building, location or


structure on a school site that has visible outward


markings indicating the building, location or


structure was operating as a school which would serve


as sufficient notice of the existence of the school or


a reason for further inquiry on the part of the


marijuana dispensary license applicant. Openly in


existence shall not mean any school that operated


secretly or discreetly without any signs or other


markings on any building, location or structure on the


school site, undeveloped land or a structure owned by


a school that was not openly used and marked as a


school site, or any school site that was established


after the marijuana dispensary had been established


and licensed by the Authority, and


b. documentation of the measured distance from the school


to the marijuana dispensary utilizing the method for

Req. No. 1126 Page 4


determining the setback distance less any allowable


error in measurement calculated and remeasured on and


after the effective date of this act as authorized by


Section 425 of this title.


4. Prior to initial renewal or transfer of a license and upon


receipt of documentation required by paragraph 3 of this subsection,


if the Authority determines that the medical marijuana dispensary is


operating contrary to the required setback distance from a school


including the error in measurement allowance authorized by Section


425 of this title, the Authority may deny the renewal or transfer of


the medical marijuana dispensary license and shall cause the license


to be revoked.


5. For purposes of this subsection, “school” means the same as


defined in Section 427.2 of this title.


Once a certificate of occupancy has been submitted to the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority showing full compliance as


outlined in this subsection, the licensee shall only need to submit


an affidavit for license renewal stating the premises continues to


comply with zoning classifications, applicable municipal ordinances,


and all applicable safety, electrical, fire, plumbing, waste,


construction, and building specification codes. An additional


certificate of occupancy along with an affidavit shall be submitted


if a change of use or occupancy occurs, or there is any change


concerning the facility or location that would, by law, require

Req. No. 1126 Page 5


additional inspection, licensure or permitting by the state or


municipality. Municipalities or the State Fire Marshal may


implement an inspection program to verify compliance with this


subsection. The Authority shall promulgate the rules necessary for


the affidavit provided in this subsection. If an application for


renewal is submitted in violation of the provisions of this


subsection or information provided on the affidavit is inaccurate or


untrue, the Authority shall suspend operations of the licensee’s


premises until compliance is reestablished. All existing medical


marijuana business licensees and registrants that do not possess a


valid certificate of occupancy, where required, shall be subject to


revocation until such time as a valid certificate of occupancy is


obtained for all applicable structures. This provision shall not


apply to medical marijuana business licensees and registrants who


submitted a full and complete application for a valid certificate of


occupancy to the State Fire Marshal or political subdivision with an


authority having a jurisdiction agreement on file with the State


Fire Marshal before February 1, 2024, and while the same application


remains under review by the State Fire Marshal or political


subdivision. Medical marijuana business licensees and registrants


are responsible for compliance with applicable state fire, building,


and electrical codes and may be liable for all damage that results


from noncompliance with state fire, building, and electrical codes


to the extent authorized by law.

Req. No. 1126 Page 6


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1126 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:33 AM











































Req. No. 1126 Page 7